dictionaries/aoo-mozilla-en-dict/dicts/en_GB (-ize) (Oxford)/en_GB-oxendict.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX R Y 81
SFX R 0 ber [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX R 0 ber's [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX R 0 bers [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX R 0 der [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX R 0 der's [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX R 0 ders [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX R 0 er [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 er [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX R 0 er [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 er [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 er [aeiou]y 
SFX R 0 er [aeo]al 
SFX R 0 er [lmbvtnp][oe]r 
SFX R 0 er's [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 er's [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX R 0 er's [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 er's [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 er's [aeiou]y 
SFX R 0 er's [aeo]al 
SFX R 0 er's [lmbvtnp][oe]r 
SFX R 0 ers [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 ers [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX R 0 ers [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX R 0 ers [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 ers [aeiou]y 
SFX R 0 ers [aeo]al 
SFX R 0 ers [lmbvtnp][oe]r 
SFX R 0 fer [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX R 0 fer's [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX R 0 fers [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX R 0 ger [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX R 0 ger's [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX R 0 gers [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX R y ier [^aeiou]y 
SFX R y ier's [^aeiou]y 
SFX R y iers [^aeiou]y 
SFX R 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX R 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX R 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX R 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX R 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX R 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX R 0 ler [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 ler [^aeo]al 
SFX R 0 ler's [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 ler's [^aeo]al 
SFX R 0 lers [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX R 0 lers [^aeo]al 
SFX R 0 mer [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX R 0 mer's [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX R 0 mers [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX R 0 ner [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX R 0 ner's [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX R 0 ners [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX R 0 per [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX R 0 per's [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX R 0 pers [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX R 0 r e 
SFX R 0 r's e 
SFX R 0 rer [^aeiolbvtmnp][aeiou]r 
SFX R 0 rer [^naeru][tm][aeiou]r 
SFX R 0 rer e[m][u]r 
SFX R 0 rer's [^aeiolbvtmnp][aeiou]r 
SFX R 0 rer's [^naeru][tm][aeiou]r 
SFX R 0 rer's e[m][u]r 
SFX R 0 rers [^aeiolbvtmnp][aeiou]r 
SFX R 0 rers [^naeru][tm][aeiou]r 
SFX R 0 rers e[m][u]r 
SFX R 0 rs e 
SFX R 0 ser [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX R 0 ser's [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX R 0 sers [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX R 0 ter [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX R 0 ter's [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX R 0 ters [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX R 0 ver [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX R 0 ver's [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX R 0 vers [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX R 0 zer [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX R 0 zer's [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX R 0 zers [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX r Y 24
SFX r 0 er [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 er [^ecly] 
SFX r 0 er [aeiodnrmvhwcsub][aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 er [aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 er's [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 er's [^ecly] 
SFX r 0 er's [aeiodnrmvhwcsub][aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 er's [aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 ers [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 ers [^ecly] 
SFX r 0 ers [aeiodnrmvhwcsub][aeiou][cl] 
SFX r 0 ers [aeiou]y 
SFX r y ier [^aeiou]y 
SFX r y ier's [^aeiou]y 
SFX r y iers [^aeiou]y 
SFX r 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX r 0 ker's [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX r 0 kers [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX r 0 ler [^aeiodnrmvhwcsub][aeiou]l 
SFX r 0 ler's [^aeiodnrmvhwcsub][aeiou]l 
SFX r 0 lers [^aeiodnrmvhwcsub][aeiou]l 
SFX r 0 r e 
SFX r 0 r's e 
SFX r 0 rs e 
SFX S Y 10
SFX S 0 es [cs]h 
SFX S 0 es [sxz] 
SFX S y ies [^aeiou]y 
SFX S 0 s [^ae]u 
SFX S 0 s [^cs]h 
SFX S 0 s [^hsuxyz]
SFX S 0 s [ae]u 
SFX S 0 s [aeiou]y 
SFX S 0 x [ae]u 
SFX S 0 x's [ae]u 
SFX P Y 9
SFX P y iness [^aeiou]y 
SFX P y iness's [^aeiou]y 
SFX P y inesses [^aeiou]y 
SFX P 0 ness [^y] 
SFX P 0 ness [aeiou]y 
SFX P 0 ness's [^y]  
SFX P 0 ness's [aeiou]y 
SFX P 0 nesses [^y] 
SFX P 0 nesses [aeiou]y 
SFX m Y 20
SFX m 0 man [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man [^bdeknmt] 
SFX m 0 man [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 man's [^bdeknmt] 
SFX m 0 man's [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men [^bdeknmt] 
SFX m 0 men [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 men's [^bdeknmt] 
SFX m 0 men's [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 sman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 sman [bdknmt] 
SFX m 0 sman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 sman's [bdknmt] 
SFX m 0 smen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 smen [bdknmt] 
SFX m 0 smen's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX m 0 smen's [bdknmt] 
SFX 5 Y 20
SFX 5 0 swoman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 swoman [bdknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swoman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 swoman's [bdknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swomen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 swomen [bdknmt] 
SFX 5 0 swomen's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 swomen's [bdknmt] 
SFX 5 0 woman [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman [^bdeknmt] 
SFX 5 0 woman [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 woman's [^bdeknmt] 
SFX 5 0 woman's [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 women [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 women [^bdeknmt] 
SFX 5 0 women [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 women's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e 
SFX 5 0 women's [^bdeknmt] 
SFX 5 0 women's [^bdklmnt]e 
SFX 6 Y 3
SFX 6 0 ful [^y] 
SFX 6 0 ful [aeiou]y 
SFX 6 y iful [^aeiou]y 
SFX j Y 3
SFX j 0 fully [^y] 
SFX j 0 fully [aeiou]y 
SFX j y ifully [^aeiou]y 
SFX p Y 7
SFX p 0 ess ll 
SFX p y iless [^or][^aeiousk]y 
SFX p y iless [or][cd]y 
SFX p 0 less [^aeiou][aeiourt]y 
SFX p 0 less [^l]l 
SFX p 0 less [^ly] 
SFX p 0 less [ous][prsk]y 
SFX Q Y 44
SFX Q le ilise [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q le ilised [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q le ilises [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q le ilising [^aeiou]le 
SFX Q y ise [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ise [^aemsy] 
SFX Q 0 ise [^i]s 
SFX Q e ise [^l]e 
SFX Q 0 ise [^u]m 
SFX Q e ise [aeiou]le 
SFX Q 0 ise [aeiou]y 
SFX Q um ise um 
SFX Q y ised [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ised [^aemsy] 
SFX Q 0 ised [^i]s 
SFX Q e ised [^l]e 
SFX Q 0 ised [^u]m 
SFX Q e ised [aeiou]le 
SFX Q 0 ised [aeiou]y 
SFX Q um ised um 
SFX Q y ises [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ises [^aemsy] 
SFX Q 0 ises [^i]s 
SFX Q e ises [^l]e 
SFX Q 0 ises [^u]m 
SFX Q e ises [aeiou]le 
SFX Q 0 ises [aeiou]y 
SFX Q um ises um 
SFX Q y ising [^aeiou]y 
SFX Q 0 ising [^aemsy] 
SFX Q 0 ising [^i]s 
SFX Q e ising [^l]e 
SFX Q 0 ising [^u]m 
SFX Q e ising [aeiou]le 
SFX Q 0 ising [aeiou]y 
SFX Q um ising um 
SFX Q s se is 
SFX Q s sed is 
SFX Q s ses is 
SFX Q s sing is 
SFX Q 0 tise a 
SFX Q 0 tised a 
SFX Q 0 tises a 
SFX Q 0 tising a 
SFX 8 Y 44
SFX 8 le ilize [^aeiou]le 
SFX 8 le ilized [^aeiou]le 
SFX 8 le ilizes [^aeiou]le 
SFX 8 le ilizing [^aeiou]le 
SFX 8 y ize [^aeiou]y 
SFX 8 0 ize [^aemsy] 
SFX 8 0 ize [^i]s 
SFX 8 e ize [^l]e 
SFX 8 0 ize [^u]m 
SFX 8 e ize [aeiou]le 
SFX 8 0 ize [aeiou]y 
SFX 8 um ize um 
SFX 8 y ized [^aeiou]y 
SFX 8 0 ized [^aemsy] 
SFX 8 0 ized [^i]s 
SFX 8 e ized [^l]e 
SFX 8 0 ized [^u]m 
SFX 8 e ized [aeiou]le 
SFX 8 0 ized [aeiou]y 
SFX 8 um ized um 
SFX 8 y izes [^aeiou]y 
SFX 8 0 izes [^aemsy] 
SFX 8 0 izes [^i]s 
SFX 8 e izes [^l]e 
SFX 8 0 izes [^u]m 
SFX 8 e izes [aeiou]le 
SFX 8 0 izes [aeiou]y 
SFX 8 um izes um 
SFX 8 y izing [^aeiou]y 
SFX 8 0 izing [^aemsy] 
SFX 8 0 izing [^i]s 
SFX 8 e izing [^l]e 
SFX 8 0 izing [^u]m 
SFX 8 e izing [aeiou]le 
SFX 8 0 izing [aeiou]y 
SFX 8 um izing um 
SFX 8 0 tize a 
SFX 8 0 tized a 
SFX 8 0 tizes a 
SFX 8 0 tizing a 
SFX 8 s ze is 
SFX 8 s zed is 
SFX 8 s zes is 
SFX 8 s zing is 
SFX q Y 33
SFX q le ilisation [^aeiou]le 
SFX q le ilisation's [^aeiou]le 
SFX q le ilisations [^aeiou]le 
SFX q y isation [^aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 isation [^aemsy] 
SFX q 0 isation [^i]s 
SFX q e isation [^l]e 
SFX q 0 isation [^u]m 
SFX q e isation [aeiou]le 
SFX q 0 isation [aeiou]y 
SFX q um isation um 
SFX q y isation's [^aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 isation's [^aemsy] 
SFX q 0 isation's [^i]s 
SFX q e isation's [^l]e 
SFX q 0 isation's [^u]m 
SFX q e isation's [aeiou]le 
SFX q 0 isation's [aeiou]y 
SFX q um isation's um 
SFX q y isations [^aeiou]y 
SFX q 0 isations [^aemsy] 
SFX q 0 isations [^i]s 
SFX q e isations [^l]e 
SFX q 0 isations [^u]m 
SFX q e isations [aeiou]le 
SFX q 0 isations [aeiou]y 
SFX q um isations um 
SFX q s sation is 
SFX q s sation's is 
SFX q s sations is 
SFX q 0 tisation a 
SFX q 0 tisation's a 
SFX q 0 tisations a 
