dictionaries/aoo-mozilla-en-dict/dicts/en_GB (-ize) (Oxford)/en_GB-oxendict.dic
adventitious/PY
alms/m
altazimuth/SM
amend/r7GDLS
animal/PM-S8Y~
antagonize/RSDG
aspect/MSGD
assembly/m5SM
attend/SRGD
august/YPT
automate/3D8WGSn1
backwood/mS
bails/m
balloon/GDMSR36
ballot/dMSr
bane/OSM6j
bargain/DGRSM
barge/DmMSZG
barrel/GMDS6
bats/m
beagle/DGSMr
beanstalk/MS
beauty/6MSjp
belief/Mp
bell/SGmMDY
benevolent/YP
bicycle/WRG3SMD
blot/GMRSD
bluff/PSDRGTYM
bodysurf/SDrG
bole/MS
bond/MmDJRGS
bounty/6DjSM
box/MG6SR2ZDá
breach/DRSGM
breathalyse/rSGD
brittle/DTGPSYM
burg/RSM
burst/rGM
bush/S2mGMJZDr
business/pm5SMá
bust/DMSZGRp
callisthenic/S
camera/MmS5
canal/-GSM8D
capital/-M893S
caravan/MSDGR
carnivorous/YP
cart/RMD6GS
chafe/SGDrM
chair/MGm5SD
channel/-9JS8RGDM
char/5GDSM
chart/RDG73MJS
cheer/RDp6G2ZjSMz
chequerboard/MS
Christ/YpMá
church/mMG5SDY
circuitous/YP
clan/mSM
class/=rGZDMwpS157m
clergy/5mSM
climb/7GRDSJM
coach/SmGMr
commentor/SM
commercial/8S-U
commit/NLSoXDGR
committee/mSM5G
confused/P
container/-8
contrive/RDSG
council/SmM5
country/5mMS
coxswain/DMSGp
craft/rDm52MGzZS
crinoline/MSD
culpable/YP
cup/DM6GS
dabble/DRSG
dairy/m5MSG
dale/MmS
deaden/Sdkr
declutch/SGD
democrat/381-WSM
destructive/P
dial/RSMGD
disdain/jMDG6S
distress/GkD6S
divisionist/SM
dot/M2ZdDkrGS
dowdy/PTY
downs/8
draught/Mzm52SZ
drill/SGDRM
dust/MZGSzRDp
Dutch/5m
duty/6jMS7
ear/6SYMDp
electuary/SM
empathy/M8WS3
empoison/SdJr
English/m5MP
enjoy/rGLBSDl
equalize/rJSGDnR
erase/NDRLSG
European/38M-S
eventful/PY
executant/MS
extort/GDVSr
faith/6DjpMGS
familiar/PYS-89M
fan/DSMGZp
fate/hjS6DM
fear/6MpGDjS
fearsome/PY
fir/ZrdS
fisher/m5
flag/mDGMJSR
flavour/pSJGD6MRj
flesh/pY2MDGZSR
fluid/89PSYM
fore/m5M
forgetful/P
fowl/DMGSr
French/Ym5Mp
fresh/TPRmY
fret/MjD6SGp
fright/DGMjS6
frost/Mp
fruit/6jdpSM
gallivant/DGSr
game/JYPTSMGRZD
Gaysoc/SM
genteel/PY
gentle/SM5PYmTGD
glee/DjSM6
God/6M
grate/jRG6SMDkJ
greatcoat/SDMp
ground/mRMGJDpS
group/SMRJGDZ3
gruff/DTPGY
Guelph/SMW
halve/rGDS
harm/GSjpM6Dr
health/M6jzSZ
heel/pRSGMDJ
help/RSjpD6JGM
hierarchy/1WMSw
highway/mMS
hit/pRMSG
homey/PSM
hone/STGDMr
horse/JpSMD5GmYá
human/~M8Y3-9PSá
hunt/DmGRJSM
hurt/kjG6SrM
image/rGDyMSp
immensity/SM
immune/-8
improbable/P
insatiable/PY
inside/SMR
institutional/8-3
interchange/SlGBDrM
ion/19MW8-S
Irish/Mm5
ivy/DMS
jar/MG6JSD
jocose/PY
journal/983SM
journey/RmSMDJG
joy/MDG6jSc
jury/35DmMSG
kin/5SmMp
king/pGSDMá
know/GJk7Sr
ladle/6GSMDr
lander/eMS
landscape/GRMSD3
laundry/5SmM
limb/SDMWp
listen/rdS7
literal/YSP
livery/DmMS
local/MY8S9-
Lutton/MS
malign/YRSDG
man/pWjMDRY16Gá
mane/ZSMp
mawkish/PY
maxim/89Mo-S
meaning/M6jpSY
mention/7SRDG
mercy/S6jpM
mine/7pMGJDRS
minim/98S-Mo
mistake/SMr
monolingualism/SM
monopole/8Z3-S
motor/OM-83mdSZ
mourn/6jJDRGS
muffle/DGRS
multitudinous/PY
nail/rSGMDp
national/8-S93
needle/pMSRG5Dá
neglect/6jSDGr
newspaper/mdS5M
newsy/TS
Norse/m
oars/m5
obit/MSr
oblivious/PY
odour/MpS6D
offspring/SMp
order/YESdM
organ/W3-819+SM
page/SM6RDG
pain/DMpSjG6
passé/SM
patter/dSr
peace/Ml6j
pedestrian/-8MS
peer/pDSGM
pendulous/PY
Picken/MS
plain/MmPGDTSY
plenty/M6j
plot/6SRMGDJpZ
plump/MrPZYTDGS~
plunk/RGDSM
plural/M8-S9Y
ponderous/YP
popular/P8Y9-
pot/RG6SZ7DgMp
povidone/SM
prayer/j6p
price/Mp
pride/MS6jGDp
private/MnYT8S-PVv
puddle/SGJYDMr
puny/PT
puritanize/DGS
purpose/6MvpVDjuSGY
purse/GRDMSpZ
Quebec/RM
radio/DmSGM
reglet/SM
regret/pS6jDGM
regular/8-YSM
remorse/pMj6
render/rdJS
resent/6LjDGS
result/6SGDMp
retard/nRDGS
revenge/D6jSMGR
rhyme/SRGDMp
ridiculous/YP
rucksack/6SMD
rudder/pMS
rusk/MS
sale/Mm5S
scallop/dSMr
scent/p
scoot/RSDGM
scorn/jDRMG6S
secular/Y8-3S
serogroup/SM
service/lmB5DMSG
shame/6MjpS
ship/Mp
shovel/MDR6GS
signal/-MR8GDmSY
silly/TPSM
skank/SGDr
ski-jump/RGD
smudge/SpDGZM
snowsuit/SM
social/M839S-Y
soul/RjM6Sp~
sow/RGDS
spacious/PY
speech/6pSM
spoke/m5S
sport/rkVmGvM5ZDS2u
squint/MSDGr
stain/SMpDGR7
states/5m
stonk/SMGDR
student/ZpMS~
stylish/YP
summon/rdS
super/5m
symbol/13W8-SwM
synecdoche/SM
talent/pMDS
tank/GMR6DS
tear/6pMGSj
telecommute/SRGD
terrible/YP
thumb/DGMSp
town/rp5MmS~
tranquilly/8-9
transpose/DNr
tree/SGpMá
trencher/mSM
tribe/SmM5
troubleshoot/GRS
trust/E6SaDGj
Ugrian/SM
unselfconscious/YP
vandal/8MS
view/JpDRGS7M
viticulture/M3r
wake/j6MGDS
waste/6jMSp
watch/7GmDRS6jM
weatherly/P
weed/pDGMSZr
whine/SRGDMZk
whiten/dSr
wire/r2ZmDpSMJG
woe/jSM6
wrong/j6GYSDPM
yacht/r5mMSDG
yuppie/SM
zest/6SMjr
